Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska36-404
Grant or assignment of existing trust; when void.

Every grant or assignment of any existing trust in lands, goods or things in action, unless the same shall be in writing, subscribed by the party making the same, shall be void.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 77, p. 296;

R.S.1913, § 2645;

C.S.1922, § 2555;

C.S.1929, § 36-403;

R.S.1943, § 36-404.